Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-628.07
Benefits; training.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Employment Security Law, no otherwise eligible individual shall be denied benefits for any week because he or she is in training approved under section 236(a)(1) of the federal Trade Act of 1974, 19 U.S.C. 2296(a)(1). Such an individual shall not be denied benefits by reason of leaving work to enter such training if the work left is not suitable employment or because of the application to any such week in training of provisions of the Employment Security Law, or any applicable federal unemployment compensation law, relating to availability for work, active search for work, or refusal to accept work.

(2) For purposes of this section, suitable employment means, with respect to an individual, work of a substantially equal or higher skill level than the individual's past adversely affected employment, as defined for purposes of the federal Trade Act of 1974, and wages for such work at not less than eighty percent of the individual's average weekly wage as determined for purposes of such act.

Laws 2017, LB172, § 37.